Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1751
Special meeting.

The supervisory committee, by a majority vote, may call a special meeting of the members of the credit union as provided in section 21-1749 to consider any violation of the Credit Union Act, any violation of the credit union's articles of association or bylaws, or any practice of the credit union deemed by the board of directors or supervisory committee to be unsafe or unauthorized.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 51.